Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 9

Review of Boards and Commissions

27-9-101. Right of review.

Anyone who may be aggrieved by any final order or judgment of any board or commission functioning under the laws of this state may have the order or judgment reviewed by the courts, where not otherwise specifically provided, in the manner provided by this chapter.

Code 1932, § 9008; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-901.

Cross-References. Applicability of chapter to attorney disciplinary proceedings, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 9, Sec. 1.3.

Board of chiropractic examiners, review, §63-4-115.

Board of examiners in psychology, review, §63-11-217.

Board of pharmacy, review, §63-10-309; peer review, title 63, ch. 10, part 4.

Board of review on child welfare agency licenses, §71-3-510.

City judge's judgment, appeal from, §6-21-508.

Constitutional basis for certiorari, §27-8-101.

Gift tax appraisal, appeal, §67-8-116.

Seizure of unstamped tobacco, review, §§67-4-1020,67-4-1021.

Teachers appeal from school board decision, §49-5-513.

Tobacco dealer, appeal from ruling, §67-4-1016.

Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, title 4, ch. 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 30; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, §§ 22, 25; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 23; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58; 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 3, 18; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 117; 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 7, 19.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 733.

Administrative Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Val Sanford), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1115.

An Examination of The Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

Claims Against the State in Tennessee — The Court of Claims, 4 Vand. L. Rev. 875.

Constitutional Law — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 763.

Disqualification of Administrative Officials for Bias (Robert N. Covington), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 712.

Enlarging the Administrative Polity: Administrative Law and the Changing Definition of Pluralism, 1945-1970, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1389 (2000).

Judicial Review of Administrative Action in Tennessee — Scope of Review, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 349.

Methods of Judicial Review over Administrative Actions in Tennessee, 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 657 (1984).

Plaintiff's Standing to Collaterally Attack a City Zoning Ordinance, 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 726.

Procedure and Evidence — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1197.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Review of Administrative Decisions by Writ of Certiorari in Tennessee (Ben H. Cantrell), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 19.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, III. Standing, an Aspect of Justiciability (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 305.

T.B.A. Approved Preliminary Report on Specialization. 14-3 Tenn. B.J. 28.

Tennessee Appellate Procedure and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (William J. Harbison), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 291.

The New Tennessee Code (Charles C. Trabue), 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 155.

The Pre-Hearing Stage of Contested Cases under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (L. Harold Levinson), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 465 (1984).

The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions in Tennessee (William H. Ewing, Jr.), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 144.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Attorney General Opinions. The statutory writ of certiorari is a process for obtaining judicial review of an inferior tribunal’s decisions, and the writ process itself does not create or constitute any substantive legal cause of action. OAG 15-09, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (2/2/15).

27-9-102. Filing and contents of petition.

Such party shall, within sixty (60) days from the entry of the order or judgment, file a petition of certiorari in the chancery court of any county in which any one (1) or more of the petitioners, or any one (1) or more of the material defendants reside, or have their principal office, stating briefly the issues involved in the cause, the substance of the order or judgment complained of, the respects in which the petitioner claims the order or judgment is erroneous, and praying for an accordant review.

Code 1932, § 9008; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-902.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 18, 34; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 117.

Law Reviews.

Recent Developments in Tennessee and Federal Procedure (Donald F. Paine), 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 276.

The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions in Tennessee (William H. Ewing, Jr.), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 144.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

27-9-103. Circuit court jurisdiction.

The circuit court is given concurrent jurisdiction over such proceeding.

Code 1932, § 9018; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-903.

Law Reviews.

The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions in Tennessee, 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 144.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

27-9-104. Defendants named in petition.

The petition shall be addressed to the presiding chancellor and shall name as defendants the particular board or commission and such other parties of record, if such, as were involved in the hearing before the board or commission, and who do not join as petitioners.

Code 1932, § 9008; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-904.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 117.

27-9-105. Security for costs.

The petitioner shall give bond for costs as in other chancery suits, or oath of paupers in lieu.

Code 1932, § 9009; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-905.

27-9-106. Supersedeas.

If the order or judgment rendered by such board or commission made the basis of the petition for certiorari shall make any material change in the status of any matter determined therein, the petitioner may, upon reasonable notice to the board or commission and other material defendants, apply to the chancellor, at the time of filing such petition, for a supersedeas, and the chancellor, in the chancellor's discretion, may grant a writ of supersedeas to stay the putting into effect of such order or judgment or any part thereof.

No such supersedeas shall be granted until a good and sufficient bond, in an amount to be fixed and approved by the chancellor, shall have been given by the petitioner, conditioned to indemnify the defendants named in the petition from any injury that may result by reason of the granting of such supersedeas.

Code 1932, § 9017; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-906.

27-9-107. Notice of filing to defendants.

Upon the filing of such petition, the clerk of the court of pendency shall immediately send, by registered return-receipt mail, to the board or commission a notice of the filing of the petition and a certified copy thereof. The clerk shall also send a similar notice to the last known post office address of each other party named as defendant.

Code 1932, § 9010; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-907.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

27-9-108. Notice prior to grant of writ.

The court before granting the writ of certiorari may require notice of the application to be given to the adverse party, or may grant it without such notice.

Code 1932, § 9011; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-908.

27-9-109. Transcript of proceedings.

Immediately upon the grant of a writ, the board or commission shall cause to be made, certified and forwarded to such court a complete transcript of the proceedings in the cause, containing also all the proof submitted before the board or commission.

The clerk of such court shall promptly, by registered return-receipt mail, notify each party named as defendant in the petition of the filing of such transcript.

Code 1932, § 9012; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-909.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

27-9-110. Defensive pleadings — Amendments.

All defendants named in such petition, desiring to make defense, shall do so by answer (in which grounds of demurrer shall be incorporated) to such petition within thirty (30) days from the date of the filing of the transcript, unless the time be extended by the court.

Any other person who may be affected by the decision to be made by such court may, upon leave given, intervene and file such an answer in the cause.

Amendments may be granted as in chancery procedure.

Code 1932, § 9013; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-910.

Cross-References. Intervention, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 24.

27-9-111. Hearing — Findings.

At the expiration of ninety (90) days from the filing of the transcript, the cause shall stand for trial, and shall be heard and determined at the earliest practical date, as one having precedence over other litigation, except suits involving state, county or municipal revenue.

The hearing shall be on the proof introduced before the board or commission contained in the transcript, and upon such other evidence as either party may desire to introduce.

The judge shall reduce all findings of fact and conclusions of law to writing and make them parts of the record.

In making such findings of fact, the judge shall weigh the evidence and determine the facts by the preponderance of the proof.

If the final decision of a board or commission revokes, suspends, or denies a license or permit that is required prior to engaging in conduct protected by the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, and either the petitioner or the respondent requests an expedited hearing, the court shall immediately grant the writ of certiorari, and shall hear the matter and issue its decision within forty (40) days of the court granting the writ of certiorari. When an expedited hearing is requested, the board or commission shall forward the transcript described in § 27-9-109 within seven (7) days of the grant of the writ of certiorari.

Code 1932, § 9014; Acts 1951, ch. 261, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-911; Acts 1987, ch. 28, §§ 1-3; 1998, ch. 794, § 1; 2002, ch. 615, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The portion of this section which requires that proof at a hearing be taken by deposition has been superseded by Tenn. R. Civ. P. 43.01 which provides that witnesses shall give testimony orally, under oath, in open court.

Acts 2002, ch. 615, § 2 provided that the 2002 amendment to (e) shall not take effect until such time as the United States Supreme Court has denied the petition for a writ of certiorari filed by the Metropolitan Government of Nashville and Davidson County in the case of Déj` Vu, Inc. v. Metropolitan Government, 274 F.3d 377 (6th Cir. 2001), or if the United States Supreme Court grants a writ of certiorari, the 2002 amendment shall not take effect until such time as the United States Supreme Court affirms the Sixth Circuit's opinion on the issue of “prompt judicial review.” If the United States Supreme Court reverses the Sixth Circuit's opinion on “prompt judicial review” the amendment shall never take effect. On May 13, 2002, the United States Supreme Court denied the petition for a writ of certiorari. Metropolitan Government of Nashville and Davidson County, et al. v. Déj` Vu of Nashville, Inc., et al., 122 S. Ct. 1952, 152 L. Ed. 2d 855.

Cross-References. Evidence to be taken orally and in open court, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 43.01.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58; 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 60; 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 22.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

Review of Administrative Decisions by Writ of Certiorari in Tennessee (Ben H. Cantrell), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 19.

Tennessee Appellate Procedure and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (William J. Harbison), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 291.

The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Acts in Tennessee (William H. Ewing, Jr.), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 144.

The Tennessee Law of Real Estate Broker Licensing (Lewis L. Laska), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 457.

27-9-112. Appeal.

Any party dissatisfied with the decree of the court may appeal to the court of appeals in the manner provided by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Such appeal shall be advanced upon the docket of the court of appeals as one of such precedence, and heard as promptly as practicable.

Code 1932, § 9015; Acts 1970, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-912; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 3(e).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 16.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure and Evidence — Tennessee Survey 1970 (Jerry J. Phillips), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 127.

Tennessee Appellate Procedure and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (William J. Harbison), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 291.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

27-9-113. Certification of decree on appeal.

The clerk of the Supreme Court shall certify and send direct to such board or commission the decree of the Supreme Court, which shall be binding upon and enforced by such board or commission.

Code 1932, § 9016; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-913.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure and Evidence — Tennessee Survey 1970 (Jerry J. Phillips), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 172.

27-9-114. Proceedings involving certain public employees.

Contested case hearings by civil service boards of a county or municipality which affect the employment status of a civil service employee shall be conducted in conformity with contested case procedures under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3.

The provisions of subdivision (a)(1) pertaining to hearings by civil service boards shall not apply to municipal utilities boards or civil service boards of counties organized under a home rule charter form of government.

Judicial review of decisions by civil service boards of a county or municipality which affects the employment status of a county or city civil service employee shall be in conformity with the judicial review standards under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, § 4-5-322.

Petitions for judicial review of decisions by a city or county civil service board affecting the employment status of a civil service employee shall be filed in the chancery court of the county wherein the local civil service board is located.

In any appeal pursuant to this section deemed by the court to be frivolous, the sanctions of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 11 may be applied by the chancellors.

This section shall not apply to the benefit board of any county having a metropolitan form of government that has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), or to the benefit board of any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), both according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. This subsection (c) shall have no effect in any county unless it is approved by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of any county to which this subsection (c) applies. The approval or nonapproval of this subsection (c) shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.

Acts 1949, ch. 266, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 9018.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-914; Acts 1988, ch. 1001, § 1; 1990, ch. 629, § 1; 2008, ch. 757, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1969, ch. 191, § 1, provided:

“That Code Section 27-914 (now §27-9-114), Tennessee Code Annotated, is hereby amended by deleting all of the second sentence in its entirety and inserting in lieu thereof the following: ‘Any such proceeding shall be heard by a judge or chancellor. Upon written demand of the county or municipal employee the proceeding shall be heard by the judge or chancellor de novo with a trial by jury. This section shall supersede and displace provisions of city charters to the contrary. Provided, however, that in those counties that have adopted metropolitan government the review shall be by common law certiorari without a jury. That this bill apply to Knox County only.’”

The Code Commission concluded that, since the act is applicable only to Knox County, it is not an act of a general nature. Hence it is not codified.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 3, 13; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 5; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 68, 69.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Review and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Toxey H. Sewell), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 253.

Local Government Law — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 881.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey (A. E. Ryman, Jr.), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257.

The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions in Tennessee (William H. Ewing, Jr.), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 144.